Tennessee, session 114, SB0514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each LEA and public charter school
shall provide age-appropriate instruction to students on how to access, utilize, and
critically evaluate various artificial intelligence tools within the curriculum taught by the
educator. The instruction must be aligned with the guidance issued by the department
of education pursuant to subsection (b).
(b) The department of education shall issue guidance to LEAs and public charter
schools on how to implement subsection (a). The guidance must include, but is not
limited to, the following instructional components:
(1) Introducing basic artificial intelligence concepts;
(2) Demonstrating practical applications of artificial intelligence;
(3) Teaching responsible artificial intelligence usage;
(4) How to access relevant artificial intelligence tools; and
(5) Developing critical thinking skills to analyze artificial intelligence.
(c) Subject to available funding, the department of education shall provide a
professional development program in artificial intelligence education for educators.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0514
002032
- 1 -